Illinois, session 104th, HB4952.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-169 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169)7    Sec. 15-169. Homestead exemption for veterans with 8disabilities and veterans of World War II.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited as provided in this Section, is granted for 11property that is used as a qualified residence by a veteran 12with a disability, and beginning with taxable year 2024, an 13annual homestead exemption, limited to the amounts set forth 14in subsection (b-4), is granted for property that is used as a 15qualified residence by a veteran who was a member of the United 16States Armed Forces during World War II.17    (b) For taxable years prior to 2015, the amount of the 18exemption under this Section is as follows:19        (1) for veterans with a service-connected disability 20    of at least (i) 75% for exemptions granted in taxable 21    years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% for exemptions 22    granted in taxable year 2010 and each taxable year 23    thereafter, as certified by the United States Department   HB4952- 2 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is $5,000; and2        (2) for veterans with a service-connected disability 3    of at least 50%, but less than (i) 75% for exemptions 4    granted in taxable years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% 5    for exemptions granted in taxable year 2010 and each 6    taxable year thereafter, as certified by the United States 7    Department of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is 8    $2,500.9    (b-3) For taxable years 2015 through 2022:10        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 11    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 12    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 13    annual exemption is $2,500;14        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 15    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 16    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 17    annual exemption is $5,000;18        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 19    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 20    Department of Veterans Affairs, then the property is 21    exempt from taxation under this Code; and22        (4) (Blank). 23    (b-3.1) For taxable years year 2023 and 2024 and 24thereafter: 25        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 26    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the   HB4952- 3 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 2    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 3    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 4    annual exemption is $2,500; 5        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 6    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 7    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 8    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 9    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 10    annual exemption is $5,000; 11        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 12    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 13    Department of Veterans Affairs as of the date the 14    application is submitted for the exemption under this 15    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 16    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 17    exempt from taxation under this Code; and 18        (4) if the taxpayer is the surviving spouse of a 19    veteran whose death was determined to be service-connected 20    and who is certified by the United States Department of 21    Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and 22    indemnity compensation under federal law as of the date 23    the application is submitted for the exemption under this 24    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 25    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 26    also exempt from taxation under this Code.   HB4952- 4 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    This amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall 2not be used as the basis for any appeal filed with the chief 3county assessment officer, the board of review, the Property 4Tax Appeal Board, or the circuit court with respect to the 5scope or meaning of the exemption under this Section for a tax 6year prior to tax year 2023. 7    (b-3.2) For taxable years 2025 and thereafter: 8        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 9    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 10    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 11    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 12    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 13    annual exemption is $2,500; 14        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 15    of 50% or more but less than 60%, as certified by the 16    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 17    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 18    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 19    annual exemption is $5,000; 20        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 21    of 60% or more, as certified by the United States 22    Department of Veterans Affairs as of the date the 23    application is submitted for the exemption under this 24    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the property 25    is exempt from taxation under this Code; and 26        (4) if the taxpayer is the surviving spouse of a   HB4952- 5 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    veteran whose death was determined to be service-connected 2    and who is certified by the United States Department of 3    Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and 4    indemnity compensation under federal law as of the date 5    the application is submitted for the exemption under this 6    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 7    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 8    exempt from taxation under this Code. 9    (b-4) For taxable years on or after 2024, if the veteran 10was a member of the United States Armed Forces during World War 11II, then the property is exempt from taxation under this Code 12regardless of the veteran's level of disability. 13    (b-5) If a homestead exemption is granted under this 14Section and the person awarded the exemption subsequently 15becomes a resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing 16Home Care Act or a facility operated by the United States 17Department of Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall 18continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be occupied 19by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the residence 20remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person who 21qualified for the homestead exemption. 22    (c) The tax exemption under this Section carries over to 23the benefit of the veteran's surviving spouse as long as the 24spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead, 25permanently resides thereon, and does not remarry. If the 26surviving spouse sells the property, an exemption not to   HB4952- 6 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem tax 2roll may be transferred to his or her new residence as long as 3it is used as his or her primary residence and he or she does 4not remarry.5    As used in this subsection (c):6        (1) for taxable years prior to 2015, "surviving 7    spouse" means the surviving spouse of a veteran who 8    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 9    her death;10        (2) for taxable years 2015 through 2022, "surviving 11    spouse" means (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 12    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 13    her death and (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 14    was killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 15    expiration of the application period in effect for the 16    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 17    sought; and18        (3) for taxable year 2023 and thereafter, "surviving 19    spouse" means: (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 20    obtained the exemption under this Section prior to his or 21    her death; (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who was 22    killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 23    expiration of the application period in effect for the 24    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 25    sought; (iii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who did 26    not obtain an exemption under this Section before death,   HB4952- 7 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    but who would have qualified for the exemption under this 2    Section in the taxable year for which the exemption is 3    sought if he or she had survived, and whose surviving 4    spouse has been a resident of Illinois from the time of the 5    veteran's death through the taxable year for which the 6    exemption is sought; and (iv) the surviving spouse of a 7    veteran whose death was determined to be 8    service-connected, but who would not otherwise qualify 9    under item (i), (ii), or (iii), if the spouse (A) is 10    certified by the United States Department of Veterans 11    Affairs as a recipient of dependency and indemnity 12    compensation under federal law at any time prior to the 13    expiration of the application period in effect for the 14    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 15    sought and (B) remains eligible for that dependency and 16    indemnity compensation as of January 1 of the taxable year 17    for which the exemption is sought.18    (c-1) Beginning with taxable year 2015, nothing in this 19Section shall require the veteran to have qualified for or 20obtained the exemption before death if the veteran was killed 21in the line of duty. 22    (d) The exemption under this Section applies for taxable 23year 2007 and thereafter. A taxpayer who claims an exemption 24under Section 15-165 or 15-168 may not claim an exemption 25under this Section.26    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (e),   HB4952- 8 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under this 2Section must reapply on an annual basis, except that a veteran 3who qualifies as a result of his or her service in World War II 4need not reapply. Application must be made during the 5application period in effect for the county of his or her 6residence. The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 7determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 8the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 9application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or other 10reasonable methods. The determination must be made in 11accordance with guidelines established by the Department.12    On and after May 23, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 13102-895), if a veteran has a combined service connected 14disability rating of 100% and is deemed to be permanently and 15totally disabled, as certified by the United States Department 16of Veterans Affairs, the taxpayer who has been granted an 17exemption under this Section shall no longer be required to 18reapply for the exemption on an annual basis, and the 19exemption shall be in effect for as long as the exemption would 20otherwise be permitted under this Section. 21    (e-1) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not 22occupy the qualified residence as of January 1 of the taxable 23year, the exemption granted under this Section shall be 24prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall 25apply beginning with the first complete month in which the 26person occupies the qualified residence.   HB4952- 9 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1    (e-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 2chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 3the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 4that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 5year, provided that: 6        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 7    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 8    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 9        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 10    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 11    as of January 1, 2019; 12        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 13    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 14    this Code; and 15        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 16    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 17    taxable years. 18    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 19service connected disability rating has changed since the 2019 20exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 21the subsequent service connected disability rating. 22    (e-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 23chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 24the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 25that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 26year, if:  HB4952- 10 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 2    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 3    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;4        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 5    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 6    as of January 1, 2020;7        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 8    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 9    this Code; and10        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 11    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 12    taxable years.13    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 14service connected disability rating has changed since the 2020 15exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 16the subsequent service connected disability rating. 17    (f) For the purposes of this Section:18    "Qualified residence" means, before tax year 2023, real 19property, but less any portion of that property that is used 20for commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of 21less than $250,000 that is the primary residence of a veteran 22with a disability. "Qualified residence" means, for tax year 232023 and thereafter, real property, but less any portion of 24that property that is used for commercial purposes, that is 25the primary residence of a veteran with a disability. Property 26rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used for   HB4952- 11 -LRB104 15922 HLH 29155 b1commercial purposes.2    "Service-connected disability" means an illness or injury 3(i) that was caused by or worsened by active military service, 4(ii) that is a current disability as of the date of the 5application for the exemption under this Section for the 6applicable tax year, as demonstrated by the veteran's United 7States Department of Veterans Affairs certification, and (iii) 8for which the veteran receives disability compensation. 9    For tax years 2022 and prior, "veteran" means an Illinois 10resident who has served as a member of the United States Armed 11Forces on active duty or State active duty, a member of the 12Illinois National Guard, or a member of the United States 13Reserve Forces and who has received an honorable discharge. 14For taxable years 2023 and thereafter, "veteran" means an 15Illinois resident who has served as a member of the United 16States Armed Forces on active duty or State active duty, a 17member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 18United States Reserve Forces and who has a service-connected 19disability, as certified by the United States Department of 20Veterans Affairs, and receives disability compensation. 21(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 22103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-596, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.